Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
ARTICLE 3
COUNTY AND MUNICIPALITY
DEVELOPMENT REVENUE BOND ACT

Section

29-3-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "County and Municipality Development Revenue Bond Act".

Source:

L. 67:

p. 671, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-1.

L. 73:

p. 475, § 1.

29-3-102. Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this article to authorize counties and municipalities to finance, acquire, own, lease, improve, and dispose of properties to the end that such counties and municipalities may be able to promote industry and develop trade or other economic activity by inducing profit or nonprofit corporations, federal governmental offices, hospitals, and agricultural, forestry, fisheries, mining, construction, manufacturing, transportation, communications, public utilities, wholesale and retail trade, finance, education, insurance, real estate, technology, and any related small business enterprises to locate, expand, or remain in this state, to mitigate the serious threat of extensive unemployment in parts of this state, to secure and maintain a balanced and stable economy in all parts of this state, or to further the use of its agricultural products or natural resources.

It is the further intent of the general assembly to authorize counties and municipalities to finance, refinance, acquire, own, lease, improve, and dispose of properties to the end that pollution may be ameliorated and controlled, more adequate hospital care may be provided, more adequate residential housing facilities for low- and middle-income families and persons may be provided, more adequate facilities for disposing of sewage and solid waste and furnishing water, energy, and gas may be provided, more adequate facilities for sports events and activities and recreation activities, conventions, and trade shows may be provided, more adequate airports, mass commuting facilities, parking facilities, or storage or training facilities may be provided, and more adequate research, product-testing, and administrative facilities may be provided, all of which promote the public health, welfare, safety, convenience, and prosperity.

It is therefore the intention of the general assembly to vest such counties and municipalities with all powers that may be necessary to enable them to accomplish such purposes, which powers shall in all respects be exercised for the benefit of the inhabitants of this state for the promotion of their health, safety, welfare, convenience, and prosperity.

It is not intended by this article to authorize any county or municipality to operate any manufacturing, industrial, commercial, or business enterprise, or any research, product-testing, or administrative facilities of such enterprise, nor to prohibit the operation of utility plants, residential housing facilities, hospitals, sewage or solid waste disposal facilities, facilities for the furnishing of water, energy, or gas, sports and recreation facilities, convention or trade show facilities, airports, mass commuting facilities, parking facilities, or storage or training facilities by any county or municipality.

This article shall be liberally construed in conformity with this legislative declaration.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 671, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-3.

L. 73:

p. 476, § 3.

L. 74:

(1) amended, p. 408, § 24, effective April 11.

L. 75:

(1), (2), (3), and (4) amended, p. 966, § 1, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1408, § 1, effective June 20.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 726, § 1, effective July 1.

29-3-103. Definitions.

As used in this article 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Bonds" or "revenue bonds" means bonds, notes, or other securities evidencing an obligation and issued under this article by a county or municipality.

"County" means any county within this state.

"Finance" or "financing" means the issuing of bonds by a county or municipality and the use of substantially all of the proceeds therefrom pursuant to a financing agreement with the user to pay (or to reimburse the user or its designee) for the costs of the acquisition or construction of a project, whether these costs are incurred by the county, the municipality, the user, or a designee of the user. Title to or in the project may at all times remain in the user, and, in such case, the bonds of the county or municipality may be secured by mortgage or other lien upon the project or upon any other property of the user, or both, granted by the owner or by a pledge of one or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the user, as the governing body deems advisable, but no county or municipality shall be authorized hereby to pledge any of its property or to otherwise secure the payment of any bonds with its property; except that the county or municipality may pledge the property of the project or revenues therefrom.

"Financing agreement" includes a lease, sublease, installment purchase agreement, rental agreement, option to purchase, or any other agreement, or any combination thereof, entered into in connection with the financing or refinancing of a project pursuant to this article.

"Mortgage" means a deed of trust or any other security device for both real and personal property.

"Municipality" means any city, including without limitation any city or city and county operating under a home rule or special legislative charter, or town within this state.

"Ordinance" means an ordinance of a city, town, or city and county.

"Pollution" means any form of environmental pollution, including but not limited to water pollution, air pollution, pollution caused by solid waste disposal, thermal pollution, radiation contamination, or noise pollution.

"Pollution control facilities" means any land, building, or other improvement and all real or personal property, and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, including without limitation structures, equipment, pipes, pumps, dams, reservoirs, improvements, or other facilities useful for the purpose of reducing, abating, preventing, controlling, or eliminating pollution caused or produced by the operation of any manufacturing, industrial, or commercial enterprise or any utility plant or useful for the purpose of removing or treating any substance in processed material, which material would cause pollution if used without such removal or treatment.

"Project" means any land, building, or other improvement and all real or personal properties, and any undivided or other interest in any of the foregoing, except inventories and raw materials, whether or not in existence, suitable or used for or in connection with any of the following:

Manufacturing, industrial, commercial, agricultural, or business enterprises (including, without limitation, enterprises engaged in storing, warehousing, distributing, selling, or transporting any products of agriculture, industry, commerce, manufacturing, or business), or any utility plant;

Hospital, health-care, or nursing-home facilities (including, without limitation, clinics and out-patient facilities and facilities for the training of hospital, health-care, or nursing-home personnel);

Pollution control facilities;

Residential facilities for low- and middle-income families or persons intended for use as the sole place of residence by the owners or intended occupants. "Low- and middle-income persons and families" means persons and families determined by a county or municipality (which determination shall be conclusive) to lack the financial ability to pay prices or rentals sufficient to induce private enterprise in such county or municipality to build a sufficient supply of adequate, safe, and sanitary dwellings without the special assistance afforded by this article.

Sewage or solid waste disposal facilities;

Facilities for the furnishing and storage of water;

Facilities for the furnishing of energy or gas;

Sports and recreational facilities available for use by members of the general public either as participants or spectators and functionally related and subordinate residential housing facilities, including residential facilities, without regard to the limitations contained in paragraph (d) of this subsection (10), for employees of the persons or entities owning or operating such sports and recreational facilities and facilities located in proximity to and in connection with sports and recreational facilities providing treatment, therapy, or recreational opportunities for persons with mental and physical disabilities and families of such persons;

Convention or trade show facilities;

Airports, facilities for the loading or unloading of unprocessed agricultural products or raw materials, mass commuting facilities, railroad facilities, parking facilities, or storage or training facilities directly related to any of the foregoing;

Research, product-testing, and administrative facilities;

Facilities for private and not-for-profit institutions of higher education; and

Capital improvements to existing single-family residential, multi-family residential, commercial, or industrial structures, to retrofit such structures for significant energy savings or installation of solar or other alternative electrical energy-producing improvements to serve that structure or other structures on contiguous property under common ownership or installation of a system that uses geothermal energy for water heating or space heating or cooling in a single structure.

(10.5) "Refinance" or "refinancing" means the issuing of bonds by a county or municipality and the use of all or substantially all of the proceeds therefrom pursuant to a financing agreement with the user to liquidate any obligations previously incurred to finance or aid in financing of a project specified in paragraphs (b) to (l) of subsection (10) of this section which would constitute such a project had it been originally undertaken and financed by a county or municipality pursuant to this article. Title to or in the project may remain at all times in the user, and in such case, the bonds of the county or municipality may be secured by mortgage or other lien upon the project granted by the owner or by a pledge of one or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the user, as the governing body deems advisable.

"Resolution" means a resolution of a county.

"State" means the state of Colorado.

"User" means one or more persons who enter into a financing agreement with any county or municipality relating to a project; except that the user need not be the person actually occupying, operating, or maintaining the project.

"Utility plant" means any facility used for or in connection with the generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electricity; the production, manufacture, storage, or distribution of gas; the transportation or conveyance of gas, oil, or other fluid substance by pipeline; or the diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing, or furnishing of water.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 671, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-2.

L. 73:

p. 475, § 2.

L. 74:

(8) amended, p. 229, § 1, effective February 7; (10) and (11) amended, p. 408, § 23, effective April 11.

L. 75:

(3), (10), and (13) amended, p. 967, §§ 2, 3, effective July 14.

L. 77:

(4), (10)(j), and (10)(k) amended and (10.5) added, p. 1409, §§ 2, 3, effective June 20.

L. 81:

(10)(h) amended, p. 1409, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 93:

(10)(h) amended, p. 1669, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(10), (10)(f), and (10)(l) amended, p. 726, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(10)(k) and (10)(l) amended and (10)(m) added, p. 1293, § 4, effective May 27.

L. 2009:

(10)(m) amended, (SB 09-051), ch. 157, p. 677, § 9, effective September 1.

L. 2022:

IP and (10)(m) amended, (SB 22-118), ch. 335, p. 2370, § 4, effective August 10.

Cross references:

In 2009, subsection (10)(m) was amended by the "Renewable Energy Financing Act of 2009". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 157, Session Laws of Colorado 2009.

29-3-104. General powers.

In addition to any other powers, each county and municipality has the following powers:

To acquire, whether by construction, purchase, gift, devise, lease, or sublease; to improve and equip; and to finance, refinance, sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of one or more projects or part thereof. If a county issues revenue bonds as provided in this article to finance, refinance, or acquire projects, such projects shall be located within said county, or, if a municipality issues revenue bonds as provided in this article to finance, refinance, or acquire projects, such projects shall be located within the municipality or within eight miles from the nearest point of its corporate limits.

To enter into financing agreements with others for the purpose of providing revenues to pay the bonds authorized by this article; to lease, sell, or otherwise dispose of any or all of its projects to others for such revenues and upon such terms and conditions as the governing body may deem advisable; and to grant options to renew any lease or other agreement with respect to the project and to grant options to buy any project at such price as the governing body deems desirable;

To issue revenue bonds for the purpose of defraying the cost of financing, refinancing, acquiring, improving, and equipping any project, including the payment of principal and interest on such bonds for not exceeding three years, funding any reserve funds which the governing body may deem advisable to establish in connection with the retirement of the proposed bonds or the maintenance of the project, and all other incidental expenses incurred in issuing such bonds;

To secure payment of such bonds as provided in this article.

To further implement section 18 of article XIV of the state constitution and to supplement part 5 of article 25 of title 31, C.R.S., any county or municipality may delegate, by resolution or ordinance as the case may be, to any other county or municipality authority to act on its behalf in the financing, refinancing, acquisition, leasing, ownership, improvement, and disposal of projects. Any such delegation may be general or limited in scope and time and may be irrevocable for the term or terms of any financing agreement or bond issue, all as provided in said ordinance or resolution.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 672, § 4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-4.

L. 73:

p. 477, § 4.

L. 77:

(1)(a) and (1)(c) amended and (2) R&RE, pp. 1409, 1410, §§ 4, 5, effective June 20.

29-3-105. Bonds to be special obligations.

All bonds issued by a county or municipality under the authority of this article shall be special, limited obligations of the county or municipality. Except as provided in section 29-3-116, the principal of and interest on such bonds shall be payable, subject to the mortgage provisions in this article, solely out of the revenues derived from the financing, refinancing, sale, or leasing of the project with respect to which the bonds are issued.

The bonds and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute the debt or indebtedness of the county or municipality within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution, statutes, or home rule charter, and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the county or municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers. Such limitation shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 672, § 5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-5.

L. 73:

p. 478, § 5.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1410, § 6, effective June 20.

29-3-106. Form and terms of bonds - exemption from Colorado income tax.

The bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the county commissioners or by ordinance of the municipality; shall be subject to such maximum net effective interest rate; and shall be in such denominations, bear such date, mature at such time not exceeding forty years from their respective dates, bear such interest at a rate, be in such form, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable at such place within or without the state, and be subject to such terms of redemption as the authorizing resolution or supplemental resolution of the county commissioners or the ordinance or supplemental resolution of the municipality may provide.

The bonds may be sold in one or more series at par, or below or above par, at public or private sale, in such manner and for such price as the county or municipality, in its discretion, shall determine; but the county or municipality shall not sell such bonds at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. As an incidental expense of the project, the county or municipality, in its discretion, may employ financial and legal consultants in regard to the financing of the project.

The county or municipality may exchange all or a part of its bonds for all or an equivalent part of the project for which the bonds are issued, the exchange to be preceded by determination of the fair value of the project or part of the project exchanged for the bonds. Such determination shall be by ordinance of the municipality or by resolution of the governing body of the county and shall be conclusive.

The bonds shall be fully negotiable under the terms of article 8 of title 4, C.R.S.

Interest on bonds issued on or after July 1, 1979, pursuant to this article shall be exempt from Colorado income tax.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 672, § 6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-6.

L. 70:

pp. 109, 140, §§ 2, 8.

L. 73:

p. 478, § 6.

L. 79:

(5) added, p. 1128, § 1, effective June 22.

Cross references:

For the definition of "net effective interest rate", as used in subsections (1) and (2), see § 30-26-301 (2)(d)(I).

29-3-107. Bond security.

The principal of, the interest on, and any prior redemption premiums due in connection with the bonds shall be payable from, secured by a pledge of, and constitute a lien on the revenues out of which such bonds shall be made payable. In addition, they may be secured by a mortgage covering all or any part of the project or upon any other property of the user, or both, by a pledge of the revenues from or a financing agreement for such project, or both, as the governing body in its discretion may determine, but no county or municipality shall be authorized hereby to pledge any of its property or to otherwise secure the payment of any bonds with its property; except that the county or municipality may pledge the property of the project or revenues therefrom.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 673, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-7.

L. 73:

p. 478, § 7.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 968, § 4, effective July 14.

29-3-108. Terms of proceedings and instruments.

The proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any mortgage or trust indenture given to secure the same may contain any provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds and constituting a covenant with the bondholders, including, but not limited to:

Provisions respecting custody of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds, including their investment and reinvestment until used to defray the cost of the project;

Provisions respecting the fixing and collection of revenues from the project;

The terms to be incorporated in the financing agreement and any mortgage or trust indenture for the project, including without limitation provision for subleasing;

The maintenance and insurance of the project;

The creation of funds and accounts into which any bond proceeds, revenues, and income may be deposited or credited;

Limitation on the purpose to which the proceeds of any bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied;

Limitation on the issuance of additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds are issued and secured, the refunding of bonds, and the replacement of bonds;

The procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated;

Vesting in a trustee such properties, rights, powers, and duties in trust as the county or municipality determines and limiting the rights, duties, and powers of such trustees;

The rights and remedies available in case of a default to the bondholders or to any trustee under the financing agreement, a mortgage, or a trust indenture for the project.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 673, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-8.

L. 73:

p. 478, § 8.

29-3-109. Investments and bank deposits.

The county or municipality may provide that proceeds from the sale of bonds and special funds from the revenues of the project shall be invested and reinvested in such securities and other investments, whether or not any such investment or reinvestment is authorized under any other law of this state, as may be provided in the proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued, including but not limited to:

Bonds or other obligations of the United States;

Bonds or other obligations, the payment of the principal and interest of which is unconditionally guaranteed by the United States;

Obligations issued or guaranteed as to principal and interest by any agency or person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to authority granted by the congress of the United States;

Obligations issued or guaranteed by any state of the United States or any political subdivision of any such state;

Prime commercial paper;

Prime finance company paper;

Bankers acceptances drawn on and accepted by commercial banks;

Repurchase agreements fully secured by obligations issued or guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States or by any person controlled or supervised by and acting as an instrumentality of the United States pursuant to authority granted by the congress of the United States;

Certificates of deposit issued by commercial banks.

The county or municipality may also provide that the proceeds, funds, or investments and the revenues payable under the financing agreement shall be received, held, and disbursed by one or more trust companies located within or without this state or in any depository authorized in section 24-75-603, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 674, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-9.

L. 73:

p. 479, § 9.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1617, § 12, effective June 8.

29-3-110. Acquisition of project.

The county or municipality may also provide that:

The project and improvements to be constructed, if any, shall be constructed by the county or municipality, the user, the user's designee, or any one or more of them on real estate owned by the county or municipality, the user, or the user's designee, as the case may be;

The bond proceeds shall be disbursed by the trustee bank or trust company during construction upon the estimate, order, or certificate of the user or the user's designee.

The project, if and to the extent constructed on real estate not owned by the county or municipality, may be conveyed or leased or an easement therein granted to the county or municipality at any time.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 674, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-10.

L. 73:

p. 479, § 10.

29-3-111. Limited obligation.

In making such agreements or provisions, a county or municipality shall not obligate itself, except with respect to the project and the application of the revenues therefrom and bond proceeds therefor.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 674, § 11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-11.

29-3-112. Rights upon default.

The proceedings authorizing any bonds, or any mortgage securing such bonds, may provide that if there is a default in the payment of the principal of, the interest on, or any prior redemption premiums due in connection with the bonds or in the performance of any agreement contained in such proceedings or mortgage, the payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with power to charge and collect rents and to apply the revenues from the project in accordance with the proceedings or the provisions of the mortgage.

Any mortgage to secure bonds issued thereunder may also provide that if there is a default in the payment thereof or a violation of any agreement contained in the mortgage it may be foreclosed and there may be a sale under proceedings in equity or in any other manner permitted by law. Such mortgage may also provide that any trustee under such mortgage or the holder of any bonds secured thereby may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if he is the highest bidder and may apply toward the purchase price unpaid bonds at the face value thereof.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 674, § 12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-12.

29-3-113. Determination of revenue.

Prior to entering into a financing agreement for the project and the issuance of bonds in connection therewith, the governing body must determine:

The amount necessary in each year to pay the principal of and the interest on the first bonds proposed to be issued to finance such project;

The amount necessary to be paid each year into any reserve funds which the governing body may deem advisable to establish in connection with the retirement of the proposed bonds and the maintenance of the project;

The estimated cost of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured, unless the terms under which the project is to be financed provide that the user shall maintain the project and carry all proper insurance with respect thereto.

The determination and findings of the governing body, required to be made by subsection (1) of this section, shall be set forth in the proceedings under which the proposed bonds are to be issued; but the foregoing amounts need not be expressed in dollars and cents in the financing agreement and proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 675, § 13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-13.

L. 73:

p. 479, § 11.

29-3-114. Financing of project.

Prior to the issuance of any bonds authorized by this article, the county or municipality shall enter into a financing agreement with respect to the project with a user providing for payment to the county or municipality of such revenues as, upon the basis of such determinations and findings, will be sufficient to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued to finance the project, to build up and maintain any reserves deemed advisable by the governing body in connection therewith, and to pay the costs of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured, unless the financing agreement obligates the user to pay for the maintenance of and insurance on the project.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 675, § 14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-14.

L. 73:

p. 480, § 12.

29-3-115. Option to purchase.

A lease may grant the user of a project an option to purchase all or a part of the project at a stipulated purchase price or at a price to be determined upon appraisal as is provided in the lease.

The option may be exercised at such time as the lease may provide.

The county or municipality and the user may agree and provide in the lease that all or a part of the rentals paid by the user prior to and at the time of the exercise of such option shall be applied toward the purchase price and shall be in full or partial satisfaction thereof.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 675, § 15.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-15.

L. 73:

p. 480, § 13.

29-3-116. Refunding.

Any bonds issued pursuant to the provisions of this article and at any time outstanding may be refunded at any time and from time to time by a county or municipality by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the governing body may determine to refund the principal of the bonds to be so refunded, all accrued and unaccrued interest thereon to the normal maturity dates of such bonds or to the prior redemption dates selected by the county or municipality in accordance with the proceedings under which the bonds to be refunded were issued, including any mortgage or trust indenture given to secure the same, and any premiums and incidental expenses necessary to be paid in connection therewith. The principal amount of any such refunding bonds may be equal to, less than, or greater than the principal amount of the bonds to be so refunded. The net effective interest rate on any such refunding bonds may be equal to, less than, or greater than the net effective interest rate on the bonds to be so refunded.

Any such refunding may be effected, whether the bonds to be refunded have matured or shall mature thereafter, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof, directly or indirectly, to the payment of the bonds to be refunded thereby or by exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded thereby, but the holders of any bonds to be so refunded shall not be compelled, without their consent, to surrender their bonds for payment or exchange prior to the date on which they are payable at normal maturity date or prior redemption date selected by the county or municipality in accordance with the proceedings under which the bonds to be refunded were issued, including any mortgage or trust indenture given to secure the same.

The proceeds of the refunding bonds shall either be immediately applied to the retirement of the bonds to be so refunded or be placed in escrow in any state or national bank within or without this state which possesses and is exercising trust powers to be applied to the payment of the bonds being refunded or the refunding bonds or both upon their presentation therefor, to the extent, in such priority, and otherwise in the manner in which the county or municipality may determine. Except to the extent expressly inconsistent with the provisions of this article, the proceedings under which the bonds to be so refunded were issued, including any mortgage or trust indenture given to secure the same, shall govern the issuance of such refunding bonds, the establishment of any escrow in connection therewith, and the investment and reinvestment of any escrowed proceeds.

All refunding bonds issued under authority of this article shall be payable solely from revenues out of which the bonds to be refunded thereby are payable or from revenues out of which bonds of the same character may be made payable under this article or any other law in effect at the time of the refunding or from the escrowed proceeds of such refunding bonds, including any proceeds realized from the investment and reinvestment of such escrowed proceeds.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 676, § 16.

C.R.S. 1963:

36-24-16.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1410, § 7, June 20.

Cross references:

For the definition of "net effective interest rate", as used in subsection (1), see § 30-26-301 (2)(d)(I); for the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", see article 54 of title 11.

29-3-117. Application of proceeds.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds shall be applied only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued and if, for any reason, any portion of such proceeds are not needed for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, such unneeded portion of the proceeds shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.

The cost of acquiring any project shall be deemed to include the actual cost of acquiring a site and the cost of the construction of any part of a project which may be constructed (including architects' and engineers' fees), the purchase price of any part of a project that may be acquired by purchase, and all expenses in connection with the authorization, sale, and issuance of the bonds to finance such acquisition.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 676, § 17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-17.

29-3-118. No payment by county or municipality.

No county or municipality has the power to pay out of its general fund or otherwise contribute any part of the costs of acquiring a project and, unless specifically acquired for uses of the character described in this article or unless the land is determined by the governing body to be no longer necessary for other county or municipal purposes, shall not have the power to use land already owned by the county or municipality, or in which the county or municipality has an equity, for the construction thereon of a project or any part thereof.

The entire cost of acquiring any project must be paid out of the proceeds from the sale of the bonds, but this provision shall not be construed to prevent a municipality from accepting donations of property to be used as a part of any project or money to be used for defraying any part of the cost of any project.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 676, § 18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-18.

29-3-119. No county or municipal operation.

When all principal of, interest on, and any prior redemption premium due in connection with the bonds issued for a project leased to a user have been paid in full and in the event the option to purchase or option to renew the lease, if any, contained in the lease has not been exercised as to all of the property contained in the project, the lease shall terminate and the county or municipality shall sell such remaining property or devote the same to county or municipal purposes other than manufacturing, commercial, or industrial.

Any such sale which is not made pursuant to the exercise of an option to purchase by the user of a project shall be conducted in the same manner as is then provided by law governing the issuer's sale of surplus property.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 677, § 19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-19.

L. 73:

p. 480, § 14.

29-3-120. Payment in lieu of taxes.

Pursuant to section 4 of article X of the state constitution, all property owned by a county or municipality pursuant to this article shall be and remain exempt from taxation. Nevertheless, any county or municipality acquiring or extending any project as provided in this article shall annually pay, solely out of the revenues from the project and not from any other source, to the state of Colorado and to the city, town, school district, and any other political subdivision or public body corporate wherein such project is located, authorized to levy taxes, a sum equal to the amount of tax which the taxing entity would annually receive if the property were owned by any private person or corporation, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding. In addition to the requirements of sections 29-3-113 and 29-3-114, the governing body, before entering into a financing agreement pursuant to this article, shall make a prior determination of sufficiency of revenues for the purposes of this section, and each financing agreement shall provide for revenues sufficient to meet the payments required by this section.

If and to the extent the proceedings under which the bonds so provide, the county or municipality may agree to cooperate with the user of a project in connection with any administrative or judicial proceedings for determining the validity or amount of any such payments and may agree to appoint or designate and reserve the right in and for such user to take all action which the county or municipality may lawfully take in respect of such payments and all matters relating thereto, but such user shall bear and pay all costs and expenses of the county or municipality thereby incurred at the request of such user or by reason of any such action taken by such user in behalf of the county or municipality.

Any user of a project which has paid, as revenues additional to those required to be paid pursuant to section 29-3-114, the amounts required by subsection (1) of this section to be paid by the county or municipality shall not be required to pay taxes on such property to the state or to any county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision, any other statute to the contrary notwithstanding. In the event the project is owned by a private person or corporation, the financing agreement shall require such private person or corporation to pay the taxes which such taxing entity or entities are entitled to receive from such private person or corporation with respect to the project.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 677, § 20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-20.

L. 73:

pp. 480, 482, §§ 15, 18.

29-3-121. Eminent domain not available.

No land acquired by a county or municipality by the exercise of condemnation through eminent domain can be used for the project to effectuate the purposes of this article.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 677, § 21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-21.

29-3-122. Limitation of actions.

No action shall be brought questioning the legality of any contract, financing agreement, mortgage, trust indenture, proceeding, or bonds executed in connection with any project or improvements authorized by this article on and after thirty days from the effective date of the resolution or ordinance authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 678, § 22.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-22.

L. 73:

p. 481, § 16.

29-3-123. Sufficiency of article.

This article, without reference to other statutes of the state, constitutes full authority for the exercise of powers granted in this article, including but not limited to the authorization and issuance of bonds under this article.

No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of bonds that provides for an election requiring an approval or in any way impeding or restricting the carrying out of the acts authorized in this article to be done shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken under this article or acts done pursuant to this article.

The provisions of no other law, either general or local, shall apply to the things authorized to be done in this article, and no board, agency, bureau, commission, or official not designated in this article has any authority or jurisdiction over any of the acts authorized in this article to be done.

No notice, consent, or approval by any public body or officer thereof shall be required as a prerequisite to the sale or issuance of any bonds, the making of any contract or financing agreement, or the exercise of any other power under this article, except as provided in this article.

The powers conferred by this article shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this article shall not affect, the powers conferred by any other law.

No part of this article shall repeal or affect any other law or part thereof except to the extent that this article is inconsistent with any other law, it being intended that this article shall provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives and not an exclusive one; and this article shall not be construed as repealing, amending, or changing any such other law except to the extent of such inconsistency.

Source:

L. 67:

p. 678, § 23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-24-23.

L. 73:

p. 481, § 17.

L. 77:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 1411, § 8, effective June 20.